Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.240

Writs and process—Issuance—Service—Defects—Amendments.

All writs and other process authorized by this chapter shall be issued by the clerk of the court, and sealed with the seal of such court, and shall be served and returned forthwith, unless the court or judge shall specify a particular time for such return. And no writ or other process shall be disregarded for any defect therein, if enough is shown to notify the officer or person of the purport of the process. Amendments may be allowed and temporary commitments when necessary.

[Code 1881 s 687; 1877 p 141 s 691; 1869 p 159 s 627; 1854 p 214 s 455; RRS s 1085.]